Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3548
Hospital district; board of directors; purchase of equipment.

(1) The board of directors may purchase all necessary surgical instruments and hospital equipment and equipment for nurses' homes and all other property necessary for equipping a hospital and nurses' home.

(2) The board of directors may purchase such real property, and erect or rent and equip such buildings or building, room or rooms as may be necessary for the hospital.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 20, p. 381;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.39.